Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.110

Commissioners—Compensation, expenses.

The park and recreation commissioners shall receive no compensation for their services but shall receive necessary expenses in attending meetings of the board or when otherwise engaged on district business.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.69.110. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 11.]